Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2692.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 307. Accessory uses of commercial solar facilities.(a) Battery energy storage project accessory use.--In a zoning ordinance enacted by a local government unit under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, a battery energy storage project shall be deemed a permitted accessory use in all zoning districts on a parcel of land that is subject to an approved special exception or conditional use for a commercial solar facility. This subsection shall only apply if the battery energy storage project is located within the boundaries of the parcel covered by the existing special exception or conditional 123456789101112131415161718 use and has a storage capacity that does not exceed the generating capacity of the associated solar energy facility.(b) Prohibitions.--A battery energy storage project permitted as an accessory use under subsection (a) shall not require a special exception or conditional use or be subject to any other land use approval from any local government unit. The addition of the battery energy storage project under this section shall not alter, reduce or otherwise affect any payment obligations, financial commitments or other terms contained in the existing special exception or conditional use associated with the siting of the approved commercial solar facility or any State or local tax exemption from which the commercial solar facility benefits.(c) Code compliance.--A battery energy storage project permitted as an accessory use under subsection (a) shall comply with all applicable Federal, State and local safety and fire codes and any regulations enacted by the Department of Environmental Protection and Environmental Quality Board.(d) Application to solar facility.--A payment obligation, financial commitment or other term contained in an existing permit associated with the siting of the approved commercial solar facility shall relate and apply only to the approved solar facility and shall not affect any battery energy storage project added under this section.(e) Limitations.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Limit the authority of a local government unit to enforce compliance with applicable codes or to ensure the safe operation of a battery energy storage project.(2) Preclude the developer of a battery energy storage 20260HB2692PN3759 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 project or the local government unit housing the project from negotiating any provisions relating to the siting of the project.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Battery energy storage project." A facility, equipment or technology that is capable of absorbing energy, storing energy for a period of time using a battery and redelivering energy after it has been stored."Commercial solar facility." An area of land or other area used for a solar collection system principally used to capture solar energy, convert solar energy to electrical energy or thermal power and supply electrical or thermal power primarily for off-site use."Conditional use." As defined in section 107 of the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code."Local government unit." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality or optional charter municipality in this Commonwealth."Special exception." As defined in section 107 of the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2692PN3759 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324